Hawaii, session 2025, HB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§11-7[]]  Elections commission.  (a)  There [is] shall be established an elections commission within the department of accounting and general services for administrative purposes. The elections commission shall consist of nine members who shall be [selected as follows:] nominated and, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, appointed as follows: (1)  The president of the senate shall [select] nominate two elections commission members; (2)  The speaker of the house of representatives shall [select] nominate two elections commission members; (3)  The senators belonging to a party or parties different from the president of the senate shall designate one senator to [select] nominate two elections commission members; (4)  The representatives belonging to a party or parties different from the speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one representative to [select] nominate two elections commission members; and (5)  One member, who shall serve as chairperson of the elections commission, shall be [selected] nominated by [the] a vote of two-thirds of all members [of] to which the elections commission [selected] is entitled and who have already been appointed and confirmed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4); provided that each group of four elections commission members [selected] appointed by each house shall include one elections commission member from each of the four counties. [(b)  The chairperson of the elections commission under subsection (a)(5) shall be selected by a two-thirds vote. (c)] (b)  A vacancy in the elections commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment as specified in subsection (a) within fifteen days[.]; provided that if the vacancy occurs in the interim period when the senate is not in regular session or special session, the chief justice of the supreme court shall promptly appoint the member nominated.  A vacancy in the elections commission shall be filled with a person from the same county as the departing elections commission member.  Elections commission member vacancies not filled within the times specified shall be filled promptly thereafter by the chief justice of the supreme court. [(d)] (c)  The elections commission shall act by majority vote of its membership and shall establish its own procedures, except as may be provided by law.  A majority of all members to which the commission is entitled shall constitute a quorum to do business. [(e)  Notwithstanding section 26-34, elections commission member appointments shall not be subject to senatorial confirmation. (f)] (d)  The term of the elections commissioners shall be four years[, except]; provided that with respect to the terms of the initial elections commission members, one member selected from each of subsection (a)(1) to (4) shall serve for a term of two years. [(g)] (e)  The elections commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.